Wyoming statutes. Title 9 Administration of the Government
Article 12. Wyoming Energy Performance Program.

Effective dates. —

Laws 2009, ch. 123, § 3, makes the act effective July 1, 2009.

§ 9-12-1201.
Definitions.

As used in this article:

“Agency” means a branch, agency, department, board, instrumentality or institution of the state of Wyoming, a county, a municipal corporation, a school district, a community college district, the University of Wyoming, the cooperative tribal governing body, the Eastern Shoshone Tribe, the Northern Arapaho Tribe, a joint powers board formed pursuant to this act or a special district specifically involved in providing facilities or functions enumerated in W.S. 16-1-104(c);

“Energy conservation measure” means an energy study, audit, improvement or equipment that is designed to provide energy, water and operational cost savings at least equivalent to the amount expended by a facility owner for such energy study, audit, improvement or equipment over a period of not more than twenty (20) years after the date such improvement or equipment is installed or becomes operational;

“Energy performance contract” means the contract that allows a facility owner to accomplish energy or water efficiency projects without upfront capital costs or capital appropriations. An energy performance contract shall not be considered to be a contract for public improvement pursuant to W.S.

15-1-113

;

“Energy services company” means the contractor not organized under the auspices of a utility regulated by the public service commission with demonstrated technical, operational, financial and managerial capabilities to design and implement energy conservation measures and the ability to secure necessary financial measures to ensure related guarantees for operational cost savings and who is responsible for the audit, design, implementation, measurement, verification and guarantee of savings for individual projects;

“Facility owner” means an agency or group of agencies, a public hospital or other public entity responsible for an individual facility or group of facilities;

“Investment grade energy audit” means the detailed engineering investigation and report of a facility’s current energy and water consuming equipment inventory, condition, operation, maintenance and performance, energy baseline, potential energy and water efficiency upgrades, life cycle costs and risks for future performance that provides the justification for the energy performance contract project;

“Wyoming energy conservation improvement program” means the Wyoming business council state energy office program designed to enable and support development and implementation of energy performance contract projects.

History.

Laws 2009, ch. 123, § 1; 2022 ch. 82, § 1, effective July 1, 2022.

The 2022 amendment,

effective July 1, 2022, in (a)(i), substituted “cooperative tribal governing body” for “joint business council of the Eastern Shoshone and Northern Arapaho Indian tribes,” deleted “business council of the” preceding “Eastern,” deleted “Indian” following “Shoshone,” deleted “business council of the” preceding “Northern,” deleted “Indian” following “Arapaho,” and made stylistic changes.

Editor's notes. —

There is no subsection (b) in this section as it appears in the printed acts.

§ 9-12-1202.
Energy performance contracting.

The council shall establish a Wyoming energy conservation improvement program which provides support development and implementation of energy performance contract projects to facility owners voluntarily participating in the program. In order to participate in the program, facility owners and energy services companies shall be subject to the provisions of this article and rules adopted pursuant to this article.

History.

Laws 2009, ch. 123, § 1.

§ 9-12-1203.
Energy performance contracting.

Upon receipt of a request from a facility owner, the Wyoming business council shall provide the facility owner with a list of energy service companies interested in providing services to the facility owner and qualified by the Wyoming business council to participate in the Wyoming energy conservation improvement program.

The energy services company participating in the Wyoming energy conservation improvement program shall provide an investment grade audit showing the estimated energy and operational cost savings that would result from the proposed energy conservation measures. Before executing any contract or lease purchase agreement under subsection (c) of this section, the energy services company shall provide the facility owner with plans for the proposed energy conservation measures prepared by an engineer licensed to practice in Wyoming.

Notwithstanding W.S.

15-1-113

and subject to the provisions of subsection (e) of this section, a facility owner may enter into an installment payment contract or lease purchase agreement for an energy or water conservation measure which meets the criteria of this section. Any documents related to negotiations entered into pursuant to this section with individual energy services companies by an agency or facility owner shall be considered trade secrets pursuant to the provisions of the Wyoming Public Records Act, W.S.

16-4-201

through

16-4-205

. After a contract has been executed by an agency, the contract and all proposals from energy service companies shall be open records available for public inspection in accordance with the Wyoming Public Records Act.

Energy performance contracts entered into pursuant to the Wyoming energy conservation improvement program shall require the energy services company to provide to the facility owner an annual reconciliation of the guaranteed energy savings. If the reconciliation reveals a shortfall in annual energy savings, the energy services company shall be liable for compensation to the facility owner for such shortfall under the provisions of the energy performance contract. If the reconciliation reveals an excess in annual energy savings, the excess savings shall be retained by the facility owner and shall not be used to cover potential energy savings shortages in subsequent contract years.

An energy performance contract entered into pursuant to the Wyoming energy conservation improvement program may provide for financing, including tax exempt financing, by a third party. The contract for third party financing may be separate from the energy performance contract. A separate contract for third party financing shall include a provision that the third party financier shall not be granted rights or privileges that exceed the rights and privileges available to the energy services company.

The Wyoming business council may provide support under the Wyoming energy conservation improvement program as requested by facility owners for purposes of this section. The Wyoming business council state energy office may fix, charge and collect reasonable fees for any administrative support and resources or other services provided by the Wyoming business council pursuant to this subsection.

If the facility owner fails to appropriate or receive an appropriation of money for a periodic payment due for improvements made through an energy performance contract, any security interest in any property created pursuant to the energy performance contract, may be enforced by the holder of such a security interest against the property.

The term of an energy performance contract shall not exceed twenty (20) years after the date on which the work required by the energy performance contract to implement all energy conservation measures is completed.

The Wyoming business council shall submit to the joint minerals, business and economic development interim committee by October 1, an annual report on the energy performance contracting performed under the Wyoming energy conservation improvement program. The report shall include the number of applications submitted, the number of facility owners, the number of energy performance contracts, the results of the investment grade energy audits and the results of the energy performance contracts.

History.

Laws 2009, ch. 123, § 1.

Editor's notes. —

There is no subsection (i) in this section as it appears in the printed acts.